hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Audio pribor > Pribor za zvučnike: Torbe, navlake i futrole za zvučnike; Dijelovi i setovi zvučnika; Izolacijske podloge za zvučnike; Torbe za stalak zvučnika; Stalci i nosači za zvučnike; Daljinski upravljači za zvučnike; Taktilni pretvarači
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Audiolaitteet > Kaiutintarvikkeet: Kaiutinlaukut, -suojat ja -kotelot; Kaiutinkomponentit ja pakkaukset; Kaiuttimen eristystyyny ja jalka; Kaiutintelineiden laukut; Kaiutinjalustat ja -telineet; Kaiuttimen äänenvoimakkuus- ja kaukosäädin; Bassotäristimet
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Acessórios de áudio > Acessórios de coluna: Sacos, estojos e proteções de colunas; Kits e componentes de coluna; Almofadas e pés de isolamento para colunas; Sacos para suportes de colunas; Suportes e apoios de coluna; Comandos e controlo de volume para colunas; Transdutores táteis
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Hangkiegészítők > Hangszóró-kiegészítők: Hangszórótáskák, -burkolatok és -tokok; Hangszórókomponensek és -készletek; Hangszóró-szigetelő párnák és lábak; Hangszóróállvány-táskák; Hangszóróállványok és -rögzítők; Hangszóróhangerő és -távirányítók; Tapintható átalakítók
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Avdio dodatki > Dodatki za zvočnike: Torbe, ovitki in etuiji za zvočnike; Komponente in kompleti za zvočnike; Izolacijske podloge in nožice za zvočnike; Torbe za stojala za zvočnike; Stojala in nosilci za zvočnike; Upravljalniki glasnosti in daljinci za zvočnike; Taktilni pretvorniki
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 오디오 부대용품 > 스피커 부대용품: 스피커 가방/덮개/케이스; 스피커 구성품/키트; 스피커 아이솔레이션 패드 및 받침; 스피커 스탠드 가방; 스피커 스탠드/마운트; 스피커 볼륨 및 리모컨; 촉각 변환기
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Аудиоаксесоари > Аксесоари за високоговорители: Чанти, покривала и калъфи за високоговорители; Компоненти и комплекти за високоговорители; Изолационни подложки и крака за високоговорител; Чанти за стойки за високоговорители; Стойки за високоговорители; Регулатори на звука и дистанционни управления за високоговорител; Тактилни превключватели
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์ทางเสียง > อุปกรณ์ลำโพง: ถุง ที่คลุม และที่ใส่ลำโพง; ส่วนประกอบและชุดลำโพง; แผ่นรองและขาตั้งลำโพงแบบกันสั่น; ถุงที่ตั้งลำโพง; ฐานและที่ตั้งลำโพง; รีโมทและตัวควบคุมระดับเสียงลำโพง; ทรานสดิวเซอร์สัมผัส
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > オーディオアクセサリー > スピーカーアクセサリー: スピーカー用カバー・ケース; スピーカー用コンポーネント・キット; スピーカー防振パッド・フット; スピーカースタンド用バッグ; スピーカースタンド・マウント; スピーカー音量・リモコン; タクタイルトランスデューサー
it: Elettronica > Audio > Accessori audio > Accessori per altoparlante: Custodie e contenitori per altoparlanti; Kit e componenti per altoparlanti; Tamponi e piedi di isolamento degli altoparlanti; Borse per supporti di altoparlanti; Supporti per altoparlanti; Comandi di volume e telecomandi degli altoparlanti; Trasduttori tattili
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Garso priedai > Garsiakalbių priedai: Garsiakalbių krepšiai, dangteliai ir dėklai; Garsiakalbių komponentai ir rinkiniai; Garsiakalbio izoliacijos pagalvėlės ir kojelės; Garsiakalbių stovų krepšiai; Garsiakalbių stovai ir laikikliai; Garsiakalbio garso ir nuotolinio valdymo pultai; Lytėjimo keitikliai
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Ljudtillbehör > Högtalartillbehör: Väskor, skydd och fodral till högtalare; Högtalarkomponenter och -satser; Isolationsplattor och fötter till högtalare; Väskor för högtalarstativ; Högtalarstativ; Volym- och fjärrkontroller till högtalare; Taktila omvandlare
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Ses Aksesuarları > Hoparlör Aksesuarları: Hoparlör Çantaları ve Kılıfları; Hoparlör Bileşenleri ve Kitleri; Hoparlör İzolasyon Pedleri ve Ayakları; Hoparlör Stant Çantaları; Hoparlör Standları ve Montaj Parçaları; Hoparlör Ses ve Uzaktan Kumandaları; Dokunsal Dönüştürücüler
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Akcesoria audio > Akcesoria do głośników: Torby, pokrowce i futerały na głośniki; Części do głośników i zestawy; Izolacyjne podkładki i nóżki głośnika; Torby na stojaki do głośników; Stojaki do głośników; Potencjometry i piloty głośnika; Przetworniki dotykowe
en: Electronics > Audio > Audio Accessories > Speaker Accessories: Speaker Bags, Covers & Cases; Speaker Components & Kits; Speaker Isolation Pads & Feet; Speaker Stand Bags; Speaker Stands & Mounts; Speaker Volume & Remote Controls; Tactile Transducers
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre zvukové zariadenia > Príslušenstvo k reproduktorom: Tašky, kryty a puzdrá na reproduktory; Komponenty a súpravy reproduktorov; Izolačné podložky a nožičky reproduktorov; Tašky na stojany reproduktorov; Stojany a držiaky na reproduktory; Ovládanie hlasitosti a diaľkové ovládače reproduktorov; Dotykové prevodníky
es: Electrónica > Audio > Accesorios de audio > Accesorios para altavoces: Estuches, carcasas y fundas para altavoces; Kits y componentes para altavoces; Almohadillas y pies de aislamiento de altavoz; Bolsas para bases de altavoces; Bases para altavoces; Controles de volumen y control remoto de altavoz; Transductores táctiles
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audioaccessoires > Luidsprekeraccessoires: Luidsprekertassen, -hoezen en kisten; Luidsprekercomponenten en -sets; Luidspreker isolatiepads en voeten; Tassen voor luidsprekerstandaards; Luidsprekerstandaards; Luidspreker volume en afstandsbedieningen; Subsonische transducers
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Zvuková zařízení – příslušenství > Reproduktory – příslušenství: Pouzdra, kryty a tašky na reproduktory; Sady a součásti reproduktorů; Izolační podložky a nožičky pro reproduktory; Obaly na stojany pro reproduktory; Stojany a držáky pro reproduktory; Ovladače hlasitosti a dálková ovládání pro reproduktory; Vibrační převodníky zvuku
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Αξεσουάρ ήχου > Αξεσουάρ ηχείων: Τσάντες, καλύμματα και θήκες ηχείων; Εξαρτήματα & κιτ ηχείων; Πατάκια & πόδια απομόνωσης ηχείων; Τσάντες βάσης ηχείων; Βάσεις & στηρίγματα ηχείων; Ελεγκτές έντασης & τηλεχειριστήρια ηχείων; Μετατροπείς δόνησης
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Accesorii audio > Accesorii difuzoare: Genți, huse și cutii pentru difuzoare; Componente și seturi pentru difuzoare; Tampoane și picioare de izolare pentru difuzoare; Genți suporturi difuzoare; Standuri și suporturi pentru difuzoare; Controale de volum și telecomenzi pentru difuzoare; Traductoare tactile
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Lydtilbehør > Høyttalertilbehør: Høyttalervesker, trekk og bokser; Høyttalerkomponenter og -sett; Høyttalerisolasjonsputer og -føtter; Vesker til høyttalerstativer; Høyttalerstativer og -fester; Høyttalervolum- og fjernkontroller; Taktile transdusere
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Acessórios para áudio > Acessórios para alto-falantes: Caixas, capas e bolsas para alto-falantes; Kits e componentes para alto-falantes; Pads e pés de isolamento para alto-falantes; Bolsas para pedestal de alto-falantes; Pedestal e suporte para alto-falantes; Controles de volume e remotos para alto-falantes; Transdutores táteis
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Аксессуары для аудиотехники > Аксессуары для колонок: Сумки, чехлы и футляры для колонок; Детали и наборы деталей для колонок; Изоляционные прокладки и ножки для динамиков; Сумки для стоек для колонок; Стойки и крепления для колонок; Регуляторы громкости и пульты управления для динамиков; Тактильные преобразователи
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 音響配件 > 揚聲器配件: 喇叭袋/喇叭罩/喇叭殼; 喇叭零組件/套件; 揚聲器隔離墊及腳; 喇叭立架收納包; 喇叭架; 揚聲器音量及遙控器; 觸覺感測器
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Lyd – tilbehør > Højttaler – tilbehør: Tasker, etuier og covere til højttalere; Højttalerkomponenter og -sæt; Højttaler – isolationspuder og fødder; Tasker til højttalerfødder; Højttalerstativer; Højttaler – lydkontrol og fjernbetjeninger; Taktile transducere
de: Elektronik > Audio > Audiozubehör > Lautsprecherzubehör: Lautsprechertaschen, -abdeckungen & -cases; Lautsprecherkomponenten & -sets; Lautsprecher-Isolationspads und -Füße; Taschen für Lautsprecherständer; Lautsprecherständer; Lautstärkeregler und Fernbedienungen für Lautsprecher; Bass-Shaker
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Accessoires audio > Accessoires pour enceintes: Sacs, protections et housses pour enceintes; Composants et kits pour enceintes; Cales et pieds d’isolation pour haut-parleurs; Housses pour pieds d’enceintes; Supports et pieds d’enceintes; Commandes de volume et télécommandes pour haut-parleurs; Transducteurs tactiles
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Phụ kiện âm thanh > Phụ kiện loa: Túi, vỏ và hộp loa; Linh kiện phụ kiện loa; Miếng cách âm và chân loa; Túi đựng giá để loa; Giá treo và giá đỡ loa; Điều khiển âm lượng và từ xa loa; Hộp lắc nhịp
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 音频配件 > 扬声器配件: 扬声器包/罩/盒; 扬声器组件/套装; 扬声器隔振垫/垫脚; 音箱架包; 音箱支架; 扬声器音量控制器和遥控器; 触觉转换器